Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2995
Reinstatement following administrative
dissolution.

(1) A limited cooperative association that has
been administratively dissolved may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement within five years after the effective
date of its administrative dissolution. The application shall
be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and state:

(a) The name of the limited cooperative association and the effective
date of its administrative dissolution;

(b) That the grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been
eliminated; and

(c) That the limited cooperative association's name satisfies the requirements
of sections 21-2906 to 21-2908.

(2) If the Secretary of State determines that (a) the application contains
the information required by subsection (1) of this section and that the information
is correct and (b) the limited cooperative association has paid to the Secretary
of State all delinquent occupation taxes and has forwarded to the Secretary
of State a properly executed and signed biennial report for the current year,
the Secretary of State shall:

(a) Prepare a declaration of reinstatement that states this determination;

(b) Sign and file the original of the declaration of reinstatement;
and

(c) Serve the limited cooperative association with a copy.

(3) When reinstatement becomes effective it relates back to and takes
effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the
limited cooperative association may resume or continue its activities as if
the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 95;

Laws 2012, LB854, § 8.
January 1, 2013